South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3150.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 7, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-7-90. A person may not be placed under custodial arrest when he is charged with a traffic offense which does not involve the unlawful use of alcohol or any other substance for which a uniform traffic ticket is issued. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----